Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-2207.13
Fifteen-hour National Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice Course, defined.

Fifteen-hour National Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice Course means the course as approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board as of January 1, 2016, or the equivalent of the course as approved by the Real Property Appraiser Board.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2212.01;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 21;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 2.
April 7, 2016